dev/apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON A3                 ! adjectives without adverbial reading & so-called "predicatives" (бар, юк);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# язгы, яшьлек, бар, юк

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;                     !# язгы кыр эшләре
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ул 14-25 яшьлекләргә бирелә."
                                                      !# "Хатыны юкның якыны юк." !# "Эше барның ашы бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# милли

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;                     !# милли музей

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Dont't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified N-INFL-COMMON





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1          ! Тулы төрләнеш

! Used for: -IR/AR-<fut>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2          ! Кыска төрләнеш

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р COMMON-CLITICS ; ! FIXME %{L%} shouldn't be neccessery here,
                                  ! change it to 'л'

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>г%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PRESENT

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<pres>

V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-VOLITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

! FIXME: duplicated code here. GER-CASE-NO_COPULA, for instance, is the same thing as "CasesWithoutCopulas" cont.class

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASE ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<advl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} GER-ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER_FUT3-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>: GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FUT-IR

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;  ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{A%}%>б%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к # ;

%<ger_fut%>:%>%{I%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>м%{A%}ск%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-FUT-AR

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м%{I%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;  ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{A%}%>б%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}рл%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к # ;

%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}рл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<inf%>:%>%{A%}рг%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>м%{A%}ск%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRESENT ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}ч%{A%}к V-PERS-S1 ;
%<fut_plan%>:%>м%{A%}кч%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE       ! Either irregular negative form or
                                             ! no negative  form at all

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
! FIXME CHECK correct default for negative
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%}%>ч%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;       ! Dir/LR
! The following is dialectal, so Dir/LR restriction is correct
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>м%{A%}енч%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;      ! Dir/LR

%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
! "Бу хәл фигыльнең юклыгы, -ып/-еп формасындагы кебек үк, -мый/-ми,
! -мыйча/-мичә, -маенча/-мәенчә кушымчалары белән белдерелә; -ып формасыннан
! аермалы буларак, бу очракта фигыль янында күбрәк "гына" кисәкчәсе сорала."
! [Хисамова 261]. Sounds correct, so add an rlx rule for this /IS/
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%}%>ч%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;       ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_impf%>:%>м%{A%}енч%{A%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;      ! Dir/LR

%<prc_vol%>:%>%{E%}с%{I%} V-PERS-VOLITIONAL ;

%<prc_fplan%>:%>м%{A%}кч%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п COMMON-CLITICS ;
! FIXME CHECK correct default for negative
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%}%>ч%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>м%{A%}%>%{E%} COMMON-CLITICS ;       ! Dir/LR
! The following is dialectal, so Dir/LR restriction is correct
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>м%{A%}енч%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;      ! Dir/LR

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_fut3%>:%>%{E%}с%{I%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger1%>:%>м%{A%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_fut3%>:%>%{E%}с%{I%} GER_FUT3-POSS-REAL ;

 LEXICON Adjectives
японияле:японияле A4 ; ! ""
актүбәле:актүбәле A4 ; ! ""
исраилле:исраилле A4 ; ! ""
абсолют:абсолют A4 ; ! ""
автоном:автоном A4 ; ! ""
агротехник:агротехник A4 ; ! ""
аерым% сөйләрлек:аерым% сөйләрлек A4 ; ! "" Use/MT
акустик:акустик A4 ; ! ""
аналитик:аналитик A4 ; ! ""
антропологик:антропологик A4 ; ! ""
арктик:арктик A4 ; ! ""
арткы:арткы A4 ; ! ""
археологик:археологик A4 ; ! ""
атаулы:атаулы A4 ; ! ""
атлы:атлы A4 ; ! ""
биологик:биологик A4 ; ! ""
биохимих:биохимих A4 ; ! ""
болынлы:болынлы A4 ; ! ""
бөтенроссия:бөтенроссия A4 ; ! ""
буржуаз:буржуаз A4 ; ! ""
гасырлык:гасырлык A4 ; ! ""
генетик:генетик A4 ; ! ""
геогафик:геогафик A4 ; ! ""
географик:географик A4 ; ! ""
геологик:геологик A4 ; ! ""
геофизик:геофизик A4 ; ! ""
гәүдәле:гәүдәле A4 ; ! ""
горизонталь:горизонталь A4 ; ! ""
грамматик:грамматик A4 ; ! ""
графитацион:графитацион A4 ; ! ""
гуманитар:гуманитар A4 ; ! ""
демографик:демографик A4 ; ! ""
диалектик:диалектик A4 ; ! ""
дипломатик:дипломатик A4 ; ! ""
докторлык:докторлык A4 ; ! ""
егәрле:егәрле A4 ; ! ""
зеландияле:зеландияле A4 ; ! ""
идеаль:идеаль A4 ; ! ""
икътисади:икътисади A4 ; ! ""
империаль:империаль A4 ; ! ""
индукцион:индукцион A4 ; ! ""
инновацион:инновацион A4 ; ! ""
интелектуаль:интелектуаль A4 ; ! ""
иң% яхшы:иң% яхшы A4 ; ! "" Use/MT
йөгерек:йөгерек A4 ; ! ""
кайгылы:кайгылы A4 ; ! ""
киеренке:киеренке A4 ; ! ""
коллектив:коллектив A4 ; ! ""
континенталь:континенталь A4 ; ! ""
көнлек:көнлек A4 ; ! ""
ләвиле:ләвиле A4 ; ! ""
логик:логик A4 ; ! ""
материаль:материаль A4 ; ! ""
мәгълүм:мәгълүм A4 ; ! ""
минераль:минераль A4 ; ! ""
молекуляр:молекуляр A4 ; ! ""
морфологик:морфологик A4 ; ! ""
муниципаль:муниципаль A4 ; ! ""
операцион:операцион A4 ; ! ""
пакъ:пакъ A4 ; ! ""
периодик:периодик A4 ; ! ""
потенциаль:потенциаль A4 ; ! ""
пропорциональ:пропорциональ A4 ; ! ""
радиацион:радиацион A4 ; ! ""
раиацион:раиацион A4 ; ! ""
ризасыз:ризасыз A4 ; ! ""
символик:символик A4 ; ! ""
спектраль:спектраль A4 ; ! ""
стратиграфик:стратиграфик A4 ; ! ""
сынлы:сынлы A4 ; ! ""
тектоник:тектоник A4 ; ! ""
террорлык:террорлык A4 ; ! ""
тәрбияви:тәрбияви A4 ; ! ""
тропик:тропик A4 ; ! ""
үзенчәлекле:үзенчәлекле A4 ; ! ""
физиологик:физиологик A4 ; ! ""
халыкара:халыкара A4 ; ! "international"
чагыштырмалы:чагыштырмалы A4 ; ! ""
эволюцион:эволюцион A4 ; ! ""
электронлы:электронлы A4 ; ! ""
энергетик:энергетик A4 ; ! ""
этник:этник A4 ; ! ""
юридик:юридик A4 ; ! ""
күршедәш:күршедәш A4 ; ! ""
рәсми% булмаган:рәсми% булмаган A4 ; ! "" Use/MT
болытлы:болытлы A4 ; ! ""
долларлык:долларлык A4 ; ! ""
ирле:ирле A4 ; ! ""
корпоратив:корпоратив A4 ; ! ""
маркалы:маркалы A4 ; ! ""
гомерлек:гомерлек A4 ; ! ""
табышсыз:табышсыз A4 ; ! ""
экс:экс A4 ; ! ""
айлы:айлы A4 ; ! ""
гадәттән% тыш:гадәттән% тыш A4 ; ! ""
катышлы:катышлы A4 ; ! ""
алдынгы:алдынгы A3 ; ! ""
ап%-ак:ап%-ак A3 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! ""
атаклы:атаклы A3 ; ! ""
ачулы:ачулы A3 ; ! ""
бар:бар A3 ; ! ""
башлангыч:башлангыч A3 ; ! "~initial"
бердәм:бердәм A3 ; ! ""
берек:берек A3 ; ! ""
бәйле:бәйле A3 ; ! ""
бәйләнешле:бәйләнешле A3 ; ! ""
елгы:елгы A3 ; ! "year's"
еллык:еллык A3 ; ! "-летний,годовой,годичный"
әзер:әзер A3 ; ! ""
әлеге:әлеге A3 ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
җәйге:җәйге A3 ; ! ""
кәбисә:кәбисә A3 ; ! ""
киләсе:киләсе A3 ; ! ""
куш:куш A3 ; ! ""
күренекле:күренекле A3 ; ! ""
күчмә:күчмә A3 ; ! ""
мөмкин:мөмкин A3 ; ! "possible"
өстәмә:өстәмә A3 ; ! ""
печкән:печкән A3 ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
рухани:рухани A3 ; ! ""
таулы:таулы A3 ; ! "" FIXME NOTE Maybe we could derive this stuff, I don't know /I.S./
тиеш:тиеш A3 ; ! ""
торак:торак A3 ; ! ""
тоташ:тоташ A3 ; ! ""
төп:төп A3 ; ! "basic,fundamental"
традицион:традицион A3 ; ! ""
туган:туган A3 ; ! ""
туган:туган A3 ; ! "родной"
тугры:тугры A3 ; ! ""
турындагы:турындагы A3 ; ! ""
үле:үле A3 ; ! "dead"
федераль:федераль A3 ; ! ""
хәләл:хәләл A3 ; ! ""
хур:хур A3 ; ! ""
һөнәри:һөнәри A3 ; ! ""
чиктәш:чиктәш A3 ; ! ""
чын:чын A3 ; ! ""
шәхси:шәхси A3 ; ! ""
эчке:эчке A3 ; ! "internal"
юк:юк A3 ; ! ""
ябык:ябык A3 ; ! "closed"
язгы:язгы A3 ; ! ""
яшьлек:яшьлек A3 ; ! "after numerals: of ageX"
рәсми:рәсми A3 ; ! ""
исемле:исемле A4 ; ! ""
